src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in the Lithuanian language are actions.

LEXICON Verbs
dirbti+V:dirb DIRBTI ;
norėti+V:nor NORETI ;
gyti+V:gij^JDEL DIRBTI;
ryti+V:rij^JDEL DIRBTI;
zuti+V:zu ZUTI;
buti+V: BUTI ; !to be
skaityti+V:skait SKAITYTI ; 

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
